Hawaii statutes.
§431:10D-626 Insurance producer training. (a)
An insurance producer shall not solicit the sale of an annuity product unless
the insurance producer has adequate knowledge of the product to recommend the
annuity and the insurance producer is in compliance with the insurer's
standards for product training. An insurance producer may rely on
insurer-provided product-specific training standards and materials to comply
with this subsection.

(b) Any insurance producer who is authorized
to sell annuity products on or before January 31, 2012, shall complete by
January 31, 2012, a one-time training course on annuity products meeting the
requirements of subsection (d).

(c) An insurance producer who obtains a life
or variable life and variable annuity products line of authority after January
31, 2012, shall not engage in the sale of annuities until the insurance
producer has completed training meeting the requirements of subsection (d).

(d) The training required by this section
shall be approved by the commissioner, be conducted by an approved continuing
education course provider, and meet the following requirements:

(1) The minimum length of the training shall be
sufficient to qualify for at least four continuing education credits;

(2) The training shall include information on the
following topics:

(A) The types and various classifications of
annuities available on the market;

(B) Identification of the parties to an
annuity;

(C) How fixed, variable, and indexed annuity
contract provisions affect consumers;

(D) The application of income taxation to
qualified and non-qualified annuities;

(E) The primary uses of annuities; and

(F) Appropriate sales practices, replacement,
and disclosure requirements; and

(3) The training shall not include any marketing
information for products of any particular insurer or training on sales
techniques.

(e) A provider of an annuity training course
intending to comply with this section shall register as an approved continuing
education course provider in this State and comply with the rules and
guidelines applicable to insurance producer continuing education courses as set
forth in article 9A.

(f) Annuity training courses may be conducted
and completed by classroom or self-study methods in accordance with article 9A.

(g) Providers of annuity training shall comply
with the reporting requirements and shall issue certificates of completion in
accordance with article 9A.

(h) The satisfaction of the training
requirements of another state that are substantially similar to the provisions
of this section shall be deemed to satisfy the training requirements of this
section in this State.

(i) An insurer shall verify that an insurance
producer has completed the annuity training course required by this section
before allowing the producer to sell an annuity product for the insurer. An
insurer may satisfy its responsibility under this subsection by obtaining
certificates of completion of the training course or from a reasonably reliable
commercial database vendor that has a reporting arrangement with approved
continuing education course providers. [L 2011, c 108, §2; am L 2012, c 66, §14]

Note

The 2012 amendment is retroactive to January 1, 2012. L
2012, c 66, §17.

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next